Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,112
Pharmacist; drug product selection; effect on reimbursement; label; price.

(1) Whenever a drug product has been prescribed with the notation that no drug product selection is permitted for a patient who has a contract whereunder he or she is reimbursed for the cost of health care, directly or indirectly, the party that has contracted to reimburse the patient, directly or indirectly, shall make reimbursements on the basis of the price of the brand-name drug product and not on the basis of the equivalent drug product or interchangeable biological product, unless the contract specifically requires generic reimbursement under the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) A prescription drug or device when dispensed shall bear upon the label the name of the drug or device in the container unless the practitioner writes do not label or words of similar import in the prescription or so designates orally.

(3) Nothing in this section shall (a) require a pharmacy to charge less than its established minimum price for the filling of any prescription or (b) prohibit any hospital from developing, using, and enforcing a formulary.

Laws 1977, LB 103, § 4;

Laws 1983, LB 476, § 23;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 721;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 150;

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 17;

Laws 2005, LB 382, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-5404;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 63;

Laws 2017, LB481, § 14.